California, session 20252026, AB2283.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Public guardians and public conservators are a critical component to ensuring those who are unable to provide for their basic needs or financial affairs and are without an available family member, friend, or other relationship are given the advocacy to protect their interests and manage their care.(b) Public guardians and public conservators are facing overwhelming caseloads with limited support from local governments and without guidance from the state.(c) The need for public guardians and public conservators is likely to grow as California’s aging population increases and as older Californians face increasing isolation.SEC. 2. Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2960) is added to Part 5 of Division 4 of the Probate Code, to read: CHAPTER 6. State Public Guardian2960. (a) The Judicial Council State Department of Social Services shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, establish a full-time position known as the State Public Guardian.(b) The State Public Guardian shall report to the Judicial Council. department. The State Public Guardian shall assist counties with performing their duties as a public guardian or public conservator.(c) The duties of the State Public Guardian shall include the following:(1) Provide guidance and technical assistance to local public guardians and public conservators to ensure compliance with state and federal laws related to guardianship and conservatorship.(2) Promote access to training materials necessary to perform the duties of a public guardian or public conservator, including those materials required for compliance with continuing education requirements as set forth in Section 2923.(3) Review existing policies related to probate guardianship and conservatorship and provide recommendations to the Legislature for statutory changes.(4) In consultation with the State Department of Social Services, develop Develop a standardized referral form for use by individuals and agencies to submit to their local public guardian or public conservator to request the initiation of a public guardianship or public conservatorship.(5) Explore the development of a single standardized reporting system to identify gaps in caseload management and provide recommendations to the Judicial Council to address the needs of local public guardians and public conservators.(d) (1) The duties of the State Public Guardian described in subdivision (c) shall be limited to the support of implementation and execution of the duties of local public guardians and public conservators pursuant to the Probate Code.(2) To the extent possible, the State Public Conservator shall not provide support with conservatorships for persons with a grave disability pursuant to the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act, as described in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.